Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVIII Witnesses, Evidence, Notaries, Commissioners of Foreign Deeds, and Legal Notices
CHAPTER 422 Evidence and Lost Records

422.010.
Judicial notice of legislative acts — Official signatures. [Repealed.]

422.015.
Judicial notice of comprehensive plan and regulation of planning commission.

Every court of this state shall take judicial notice of any comprehensive plan and any regulation adopted pursuant to KRS Chapter 100.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 141, § 44, effective July 15, 1986.

422.020.
Copies of domestic records or documents admissible in evidence. [Repealed.]

422.030.
Printed laws of other states and United States — Evidence when. [Repealed.]

422.040.
Court records of other states and United States entitled to full faith and credit.

The records and judicial proceedings of any court of any state, attested by the clerk thereof in due form, with the seal of the court annexed if there be a seal, and certified by the judge, chief justice, or presiding magistrate of the court, shall have the same faith and credit given to them in this state as they would have at the place from which the records come. The record and judicial proceedings of any court of the United States attested by the clerk thereof, with the seal of the court annexed if there be a seal, shall have the same faith and credit given to them in this state as they would have in the courts of the United States.

History.

1635.

422.050.
Copies of records of other states and United States — Evidence when. [Repealed.]

422.060.
Proof of common law of other states. [Repealed.]

422.070.
Foreign law — Proof of. [Repealed.]

422.080.
Foreign records and laws — Copies as evidence. [Repealed.]

422.081.
Judicial notice of laws of other states and jurisdictions. [Repealed.]

422.082.
Information of the court. [Repealed.]

422.083.
Ruling reviewable. [Repealed.]

422.084.
Evidence as to laws of other jurisdictions. [Repealed.]

422.085.
Laws of foreign countries. [Repealed.]

422.086.
Interpretation. [Repealed.]

422.087.
Short title. [Repealed.]

422.090.
Discharge from military or naval service may be recorded — Persons entitled to copies — Copies as evidence — Exemption from public disclosure except by certain persons or on order of court — Request to destroy copies — Reminder to ensure confidentiality.

All discharge papers, including Form DD-214, given, executed or delivered to any person in the military or naval service of the United States, which evidence his discharge from the service of the United States and show the unit or part of the department to which he was attached and from which he was discharged may be recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the person discharged is a resident. Upon the presentation of such discharge papers the county clerk shall record them, without charge therefor, in a suitable book which he shall provide for that purpose.

A certified or attested copy of such recorded discharge is admissible evidence in all proceedings in which such discharge may come in question or in which it might be used as legal evidence of any fact.

It shall be the duty of each county clerk to index alphabetically the name of each person whose discharge papers are recorded as provided in this section and to keep such index as a permanent record in such office. This index shall be a public record which shall be disclosed to any member of the public. The index shall not be bound with the book in which the discharge papers are recorded, but shall be a separate bound index.

Except as provided in subsections (5) and (6) of this section, discharge papers recorded with the county clerk shall not be public records subject to public disclosure.

Upon presentation of proper identification, the following individuals may be provided with a copy, a certified copy, or an attested copy of discharge papers recorded with the county clerk:

The veteran named in the discharge papers;

His or her spouse, widow or widower, child eighteen (18) years of age or older, parent, grandparent, or sibling eighteen (18) years of age or older;

Any person authorized by the veteran;

A guardian, limited guardian, conservator, or limited conservator of a disabled or partially disabled veteran named in the discharge papers;

An individual with power of attorney for the veteran;

A funeral director handling funeral arrangements for the veteran; and

The personal representative of the veteran’s estate.

Discharge papers shall be subject to discovery under the federal and Kentucky rules of criminal and civil procedure.

The county clerk shall comply with any proper court order pertaining to discharge papers.

Upon presentation of proper identification, a veteran may ask the county clerk to destroy that veteran’s discharge papers. Within fifteen (15) days of receiving the request, the county clerk shall destroy all copies of the discharge papers in whatever form they are being held.

With regard to military discharge papers, including Form DD-214, filed before July 13, 2004, if a county clerk has commingled such discharge papers with documents unrelated to military discharge, that county clerk, in handling such discharge papers, may comply with the provisions in subsections (4), (5), and (6) of this section as well as the provision in subsection (3) of this section that the index shall not be bound with the book in which the discharge papers are recorded but shall be a separate bound index.

The Kentucky Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall send a reminder of the provisions of this section to all Kentucky county clerks in January of each year to ensure the confidentiality of veterans’ discharge papers.

History.

1637a-1, 1637a-2, 1637a-4: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 32, § 1; 1978, ch. 384, § 523, effective June 17, 1978; 2004, ch. 52, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 20, § 1, effective July 15, 2010.

422.100.
Notarized instruments. [Repealed.]

422.105.
Photographic copies of business and public records are admissible in evidence. [Repealed.]

422.106.
Citation of KRS 422.105. [Repealed.]

422.110.
Obtaining confessions by “sweating” prohibited.

No peace officer, or other person having lawful custody of any person charged with crime, shall attempt to obtain information from the accused concerning his connection with or knowledge of crime by plying him with questions, or extort information to be used against him on his trial by threats or other wrongful means, nor shall the person having custody of the accused permit any other person to do so.

History.

1649b-1 to 1649b-3: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 141, § 2; 1990, ch. 88, §§ 78, 93, effective July 1, 1992.

422.115.
Furnishing report of theater attendance survey.

Any person employed as a private investigator or confidential investigator for the purpose of determining or attempting to determine the attendance or number of paid admissions at any motion picture theater performance in this state shall furnish to the owner or general manager of the theater checked, a report of his finding on the next succeeding day and within five (5) days after such check, a written copy of his finding or report.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 22, §§ 1, 2; 1990, ch. 88, §§ 79, 93, effective July 1, 1992.

422.120.
Evidence of genuineness of handwriting — Comparison. [Repealed.]

422.130.
Presumption of death.

Except as provided in KRS

422.132

, if any person who has resided in this state goes from and does not return to this state for seven (7) successive years, he shall be presumed to be dead, in any case wherein his death comes in question, unless proof is made that he was alive within that time.

History.

1639: amend. Acts 2002, ch. 57, § 3, effective July 15, 2002.

422.132.
Presumption of death following catastrophic event — Declaration — Death certificate — Attorney General.

A resident or nonresident of this Commonwealth who is exposed to a specific event which has been declared a disaster or emergency pursuant to KRS Chapter 39A and which is certified by the Governor as a catastrophic event that has resulted in the loss of life to persons known or unknown and whose absence following that event is not satisfactorily explained after diligent search or inquiry is presumed to be dead. The death is presumed to have occurred at the time of the catastrophic event.

A District Court may declare the absent person dead, if it is satisfied that the absentee should be presumed dead under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section. A declaration with respect to a nonresident shall affect only property located within the Commonwealth.

At the request of an applicant who has obtained a declaration based upon subsection (1) of this section, the court shall order the registrar of vital statistics to issue, at no cost to the applicant, a death certificate. The state registrar may indicate on the certificate that it was issued to court order in accordance with this section.

The Attorney General may initiate or intervene in any proceedings or action brought pursuant to this section, including a class action law suit, on behalf of the citizens of the Commonwealth to seek a declaration of death of an absentee under subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 57, § 1, effective July 15, 2002.

422.135.
Determination by a federal agency is prima facie evidence of occurrence of death.

A determination of death made by a federal agency or military service of the United States government pursuant to Title 5, United States Code, Chapter 55, subchapter VII; Title 37, United States Code, Chapter 10, or other applicable federal law shall be prima facie evidence that the death actually occurred with respect to any proceeding in any court in the Commonwealth of Kentucky or with respect to any action of an agency of government in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 183, § 1, June 16, 1972.

422.140.
Officer’s conduct does not estop contest of tax or indebtedness.

No conduct, statement, or representation of any officer of any county, city, or taxing district, shall serve to estop the county, city or taxing district from contesting the legality of any tax or indebtedness authorized or created by it in excess of the constitutional or legal limits relating thereto.

History.

1649c-1: amend. Acts 1990, ch. 88, §§ 80, 93, effective July 1, 1992.

422.150.
Testimony taken at trial — Use at subsequent trial. [Repealed.]

422.160.
Right to perpetuate evidence concerning land.

Persons who own any real property or any interest therein or appurtenances thereto, may by deposition perpetuate the testimony of any and all living witnesses relative to their title in the manner provided in KRS

422.170

to

422.190

.

History.

1649a-1.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Lands, § 300.00.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Logs and Timber, § 352.00.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Statement of Intent to Perpetuate Testimony Under KRS

422.160

et seq., Form 300.02.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Synopsis to Chapter 300 Lands, § 300.syn.

422.170.
Statement to be filed by person desiring to perpetuate evidence.

The party desiring to perpetuate any testimony as provided in KRS

422.160

shall file, in the circuit clerk’s office in the county where the real property is located, a statement which shall set forth that he has a title to the real property about which he desires to take testimony or evidence.

If any parties who may be interested or claim to be interested in the real property are known to the party filing the statement, the statement shall be directed to them and shall give their names and addresses, if known, and if they are nonresidents of this state, the state or county in which they reside, if known.

If one (1) or more of the parties are unknown, the statement shall be directed to the parties known to be interested, with the statement in the caption, “to whom it may concern, and to all parties interested in the real property herein described.”

If no person is known to be interested in the real property, the statement shall be directed “to any and all parties interested in following described real estate,” setting forth by description the real estate about which testimony is to be taken.

The statement shall also set forth the time and place the depositions are to be taken, and the names of one (1) or more witnesses whose testimony or evidence is to be taken at the time stipulated in the statement. The statement shall be subscribed and verified by the party filing it or by his attorney, representative or agent and shall be filed before the notice provided for in KRS

422.180

shall be given.

Upon the filing of the statement, the circuit clerk shall mark it “filed,” and record it in a book kept by him for that purpose, properly labeled and indexed, for which recording he shall receive a fee of one dollar ($1).

If any claimant or probable claimant to whom the statement is directed is an infant, a lawyer guardian ad litem shall be designated to represent such infant by the clerk of the court. The clerk shall appoint an attorney to represent nonresident interested parties, claimants, or probable claimants. The same lawyer may be appointed to represent as attorney and guardian ad litem nonresident parties whether infants or not.

History.

1649a-1: amend. Acts 1980, ch. 188, § 290, effective July 15, 1980.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Lands, § 300.00.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Statement of Intent to Perpetuate Testimony Under KRS

422.160

et seq., Form 300.02.

422.180.
Notice — Duty of guardian ad litem and attorney.

The party desiring to take the deposition of any witness shall give ten (10) days’ notice in writing to all parties known to him to be interested in, or setting up or attempting to set up claim to, the real property or any interest therein. The notice shall state the time and place the depositions will be commenced to be taken, and that the same will be continued from day to day, at the same place and between the hours of 8 a.m. and 6 p.m., until the same is completed and that depositions are to be taken in behalf of the title to a certain tract of land known as . . . . . tract, lying on the . . . . . (here give the local description), in . . . . . County, in the State of Kentucky, and that the depositions are being taken for the purpose of perpetuation of the testimony expected to be given. The party desiring to take the deposition shall give further notice, as above recited, by having the notice published pursuant to KRS Chapter 424. Such party shall also have a like notice posted at the front door of the courthouse in the county where the real property lies at least fifteen (15) days before the taking of the depositions. Sixty (60) days’ notice shall be given to nonresidents of the time of taking of such depositions unless they waive notice through their attorney or otherwise.

The guardian ad litem for an infant and the attorney for a nonresident shall, as soon as notified of his appointment, if possible, give written notice to the infant or nonresident whom he represents of the fact and nature and purpose of the proceeding, and if no person, other than himself, appears by special employment to represent those whom he was appointed to represent, he shall appear and, if necessary, cross-examine and do all necessary to protect the interest of his ward or nonresident claimant against any fraud, imposition or injury. Such guardian ad litem or attorney shall file with the clerk a written report showing what effort he made to give notice to his ward or nonresident party, and state what, if any, information he has received from them, and shall be allowed a reasonable sum for his services to be paid by the party seeking to perpetuate the evidence.

History.

1649a-1: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 228.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Lands, § 300.00.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Statement of Intent to Perpetuate Testimony Under KRS

422.160

et seq., Form 300.02.

422.190.
Depositions taken in perpetuation of evidence to be recorded.

When the depositions provided for in KRS

422.160

to

422.180

are completed and subscribed by the witness, they shall be certified to the circuit clerk of the county where the real property is located, by the officer before whom they were taken, in the same manner as other depositions are certified, and the officer shall take the clerk’s receipt therefor.

The clerk, upon receipt of the depositions, shall immediately mark the same “lodged in my office to be recorded” and give the date of the lodgment, and record the said depositions in a book kept by him for that purpose, properly labeled and indexed. Upon application the clerk shall deliver the original of the deposition to the party on whose behalf the depositions were taken. The clerk shall be allowed one dollar ($1) for each separate deposition that he records.

The original or certified copy of the deposition or the record shall be evidence in any and all courts of this state.

History.

1649a-1.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Lands, § 300.00.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Logs and Timber, § 352.00.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Statement of Intent to Perpetuate Testimony Under KRS

422.160

et seq., Form 300.02.

422.200.
Papers in suit lost — How supplied.

When any papers in any suit pending or decided in any court have been lost, destroyed, defaced, or obliterated, and there is in existence an attested copy thereof, such copy may be filed in the office where such papers belong in lieu of the originals, and shall be prima facie evidence of the contents of the originals, and may be used as such originals could have been in all after proceedings in the suits to which the original papers belonged. The party whose rights or interests are affected by the filing of such copies shall be notified thereof, and may, upon notice to the adverse party or his attorney, move to strike such copies from the files, and the court shall, if justice requires, strike them from the files of the court.

History.

1643: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 425, effective January 2, 1978.

422.210.
Lost judgment or order — How supplied.

If the record of any unexecuted judgment or final order of a court of record of this state is lost, mutilated, defaced, or destroyed, any person interested therein may, upon ten (10) days’ written notice to the adverse party, move the court in which the judgment was rendered or final order was made to reenter the same of record. Upon satisfactory proof that a judgment or final order has theretofore been entered of record and that it has been mutilated, defaced, or destroyed, and the purport thereof, the court shall reenter it of record. The reentered judgment or final order shall have the same effect as the original and official copies thereof shall be admissible as evidence for all purposes for which copies of the original would be competent. No judgment for costs shall be rendered against the defendant in the motion unless he controverts the plaintiff’s right and fails in his defense.

History.

3991.

422.220.
Bond with force of judgment, lost — How supplied.

If a bond having the force and effect of a judgment, is lost, destroyed, mutilated, or defaced, any person interested therein may, upon ten (10) days’ written notice to the adverse party, move the court in which the bond was on file to award execution thereon. Upon satisfactory proof that such bond has existed, that it has been lost, destroyed, mutilated, or defaced, the purport thereof, and that it remains undischarged, the court shall award execution thereon, endorsed as though execution were issued on the bond, if in existence. No judgment for costs shall be rendered against the defendant in the motion, unless he controverts the plaintiff’s right to an execution and fails in his defense.

History.

3992.

422.230.
Order of court or bond filed therein — How supplied when lost.

If an order of a court, appointing an administrator, guardian or any person to any place, station, or trust or, if the bond executed by any such person, or by an officer, is destroyed, obliterated, or lost, the court shall, by the appropriate proceeding, due notice thereof being given, supply the record, and require such person to execute a new bond, with good and sufficient sureties. If the person fails to execute a new bond when so required the court shall enter an order vacating his office or station.

History.

3993: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 426, effective January 2, 1978.

422.240.
Commissioner to supply records of court.

If the records or papers of any court are lost, destroyed, defaced, or obliterated, the court shall appoint a commissioner, who shall have power and authority to fix on a convenient place to meet for the purpose of hearing evidence in regard to the lost records or papers, giving reasonable public notice thereof.

The commissioner shall be paid a reasonable compensation out of the county treasury and shall not remain in office longer than one (1) year.

The commissioner may, at the instance of any person, issue a summons and cause the attendance of witnesses, and take evidence, in writing, of such witnesses, relative to any record or paper so destroyed, defaced, or obliterated. The deposition shall be legal evidence, and shall be returned to the clerk of the court and safely kept by such clerk. Before any proof is taken, the party offering it must make and file with the commissioner an affidavit that there is no attested copy of the record or papers in existence known to him. If the affidavit is not made, no testimony taken shall be evidence.

History.

3994 to 3996.

422.250.
Reentering instrument — Effect of.

If any record book, containing judgments, decrees, orders, executions, or proceedings of a court, is lost, destroyed, or becomes illegible, and can be again entered correctly by means of any writing, the court may order its clerk to have the matter reentered. The reentered record, when approved by the court, shall have the same effect as the original.

If any record book of written instruments, or any such instrument, filed in any clerk’s office is lost, destroyed, or becomes illegible, the clerk shall upon the production of any original paper which was recorded in the lost book, or an attested copy from the record, or of anything else in said book, or of any paper so filed, on the request of the person interested, rerecord the instrument and shall certify on the record whether it was recorded from the original or a copy, and how it was authenticated. Such record shall be prima facie evidence.

History.

3997, 3998.

422.260.
Copy of record impounded in court may be recorded to supply lost record.

If any written instrument, required or authorized by law to be recorded, has been recorded, and the book containing it has been lost, destroyed, mutilated, or defaced, and an attested copy thereof is impounded in any court of this state, or any Circuit Court of the United States, or the Supreme Court thereof, any person may procure a copy of such copy, attested by the officer having the custody thereof, and produce it to the clerk in whose office the originals were recorded. The clerk shall rerecord the instrument and certify that it was recorded from a copy of a copy, and such record shall be prima facie evidence. The clerk shall also retain and file the copy from which the record was made.

History.

3999.

422.270.
Action to supply lost record.

When any written instrument, authorized by law to be recorded, has been so recorded, and the book containing it has been lost, destroyed, mutilated or defaced, and there is not in existence a copy of such writing known to the person claiming under it, such person may institute a suit in equity, in the county where such instrument was recorded, against the grantors or obligors in the writing, or his heirs or personal representatives, setting forth the fact of the existence of such writing, and the destruction of the record. Upon hearing, the court may render judgment that the defendants make and execute another writing in lieu of the original, of the same tenor and effect. Upon the failure of the defendants to execute a new writing within a reasonable time, the court shall cause the same to be executed by a commissioner, which shall vest in plaintiff all the rights vested in him by the original writing. If the recorded instrument be a conveyance for land, the plaintiff may make defendants any or all who have had title to the land for fifteen (15) years preceding the institution of the suit. No judgment for costs shall be rendered against the defendants unless they make defense and fail therein, except that, if they fail to convey or execute a new writing when adjudged to do so by the court, they shall, if adults, pay the cost of making the writing by a commissioner.

History.

4000.

422.280.
Liability for damage to or loss of boarded horses — Negligence not presumed.

As used in this section:

The term “boarder” means one who holds out his land, barn or related facilities to others for compensation, by which is meant compensation in any manner, whether money or otherwise, for the custody, care, breeding or selling of horses;

The term “owner” means one who has contracted with the boarder for the custody, care, breeding or selling of horses.

The owner shall be liable for damages to or loss of the horse while in the custody of the boarder except for that damage or loss due to the negligence of the boarder, his agent or employees. Evidence that the owner delivered horses to the boarder and that the horses were damaged or lost while in the care and custody of the boarder shall not be sufficient to create a presumption of negligence on the part of the boarder, or a prima facie case in favor of the owner.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 283, § 1.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Miller & Woodford, Equine Law: Litigating the Horse Transportation Claim., Vol. 71, No. 3, May 2007, Ky. Bench & Bar 15.

422.285.
Person convicted of certain offenses may request DNA testing — Right to counsel — Deposit — Court orders — Cost — Access to reports — Preservation of evidence — Dismissal — Hearing when results favorable to petitioner.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a person who was convicted of a capital offense, a Class A felony, a Class B felony, or any offense designated a violent offense under KRS

439.3401

and who meets the requirements of this section may at any time request the forensic deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) testing and analysis of any evidence that is in the possession or control of the court or Commonwealth, that is related to the investigation or prosecution that resulted in the judgment of conviction and that may contain biological evidence.

This subsection shall not apply to offenses under KRS Chapter 218A, unless the offense was accompanied by another offense outside of that chapter for which testing is authorized by paragraph (a) of this subsection.

Upon receipt of a request under this section accompanied by a supporting affidavit containing sufficient factual averments to support the request from a person who meets the requirements of subsection (5)(f) of this section at the time the request is made for an offense to which the DNA relates, the court shall:

If the petitioner is not represented by counsel, appoint the Department of Public Advocacy to represent the petitioner for purposes of the request, pursuant to KRS 31.110(2)(c); or

If the petitioner is represented by counsel or waives appointment of counsel in writing or if the Department of Public Advocacy has previously withdrawn from representation of the petitioner for purposes of the request, require the petitioner to deposit an amount certain with the court sufficient to cover the reasonable costs of the testing being requested.

Counsel representing the petitioner shall be provided a reasonable opportunity to investigate the petitioner’s request and shall be permitted to supplement the request. Pursuant to KRS 31.110(2)(c), the petitioner shall have no further right to counsel provided by the Department of Public Advocacy on the matter if counsel determines that it is not a proceeding that a reasonable person with adequate means would be willing to bring at his or her own expense. If the Department of Public Advocacy moves to withdraw as counsel for petitioner and the court grants the motion, the court shall proceed as directed under subsection (2)(b) of this section.

Upon receipt of the deposit required under subsection (2)(b) of this section or a motion from counsel provided by the Department of Public Advocacy to proceed, the court shall provide notice to the prosecutor and an opportunity to respond to the petitioner’s request.

After due consideration of the request and any supplements and responses thereto, the court shall order DNA testing and analysis if the court finds that all of the following apply:

A reasonable probability exists that the petitioner would not have been prosecuted or convicted if exculpatory results had been obtained through DNA testing and analysis;

The evidence is still in existence and is in a condition that allows DNA testing and analysis to be conducted;

The evidence was not previously subjected to DNA testing and analysis or was not subjected to the testing and analysis that is now requested and may resolve an issue not previously resolved by the previous testing and analysis;

Except for a petitioner sentenced to death, the petitioner was convicted of the offense after a trial or after entering an Alford plea;

Except for a petitioner sentenced to death, the testing is not sought for touch DNA, meaning casual or limited contact DNA; and

The petitioner is still incarcerated or on probation, parole, or other form of correctional supervision, monitoring, or registration for the offense to which the DNA relates.

After due consideration of the request and any supplements and responses thereto, the court may order DNA testing and analysis if the court finds that all of the following apply:

A reasonable probability exists that either:

The petitioner’s verdict or sentence would have been more favorable if the results of DNA testing and analysis had been available at the trial leading to the judgment of conviction; or

DNA testing and analysis will produce exculpatory evidence;

The evidence is still in existence and is in a condition that allows DNA testing and analysis to be conducted;

The evidence was not previously subject to DNA testing and analysis or was not subjected to the testing and analysis that is now requested and that may resolve an issue not previously resolved by the previous testing and analysis;

Except for a petitioner sentenced to death, the petitioner was convicted of the offense after a trial or after entering an Alford plea;

Except for a petitioner sentenced to death, the testing is not sought for touch DNA, meaning casual or limited contact DNA; and

The petitioner is still incarcerated or on probation, parole, or other form of correctional supervision, monitoring, or registration for the offense to which the DNA relates.

The provisions of KRS

17.176

to the contrary notwithstanding, the petitioner shall pay the costs of all testing and analysis ordered under this section. If the court determines that the petitioner is a needy person using the standards set out in KRS

31.120

and the Department of Public Advocacy so moves, the court shall treat the costs of testing and analysis as a direct expense of the defense for the purposes of authorizing payment under KRS

31.185

.

If the prosecutor or defense counsel has previously subjected evidence to DNA testing and analysis, the court shall order the prosecutor or defense counsel to provide all the parties and the court with access to the laboratory reports that were prepared in connection with the testing and analysis, including underlying data and laboratory notes. If the court orders DNA testing and analysis pursuant to this section, the court shall order the production of any laboratory reports that are prepared in connection with the testing and analysis and may order the production of any underlying data and laboratory notes.

If a petition is filed pursuant to this section, the court shall order the state to preserve during the pendency of the proceeding all evidence in the state’s possession or control that could be subjected to DNA testing and analysis. The state shall prepare an inventory of the evidence and shall submit a copy of the inventory to the defense and the court. If the evidence is intentionally destroyed after the court orders its preservation, the court may impose appropriate sanctions, including criminal contempt.

The court may make any other orders that the court deems appropriate, including designating any of the following:

The preservation of some of the sample for replicating the testing and analysis; and

Elimination samples from third parties.

If the results of the DNA testing and analysis are not favorable to the petitioner, the court shall dismiss the petition. The court may make further orders as it deems appropriate, including any of the following:

Notifying the Department of Corrections and the Parole Board;

Requesting that the petitioner’s sample be added to the Department of Kentucky State Police database; and

Providing notification to the victim or family of the victim.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law that would bar a hearing as untimely, if the results of the DNA testing and analysis are favorable to the petitioner, the court shall order a hearing and make any further orders that are required pursuant to this section or the Kentucky Rules of Criminal Procedure.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 307, effective June 26, 2007; 2013, ch. 77, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 167, § 17, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2002). Under the authority of
KRS

7.136

, the Reviser of Statutes has corrected a manifest clerical or typographical error in the second sentence of subsection (5) of this section as enacted in
2002 Ky. Acts ch. 154, sec. 1, by inserting “and” after the second appearance of “testing and analysis.”

422.287.
Motion for DNA testing of evidence — Court order — Results — Maintaining results.

When a person is being tried for a capital offense and there is evidence in the case which may be subjected to deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) testing and analysis, the Commonwealth or the defendant may move to have any item of evidence not previously subjected to DNA testing and analysis tested and analyzed.

If the court is satisfied that the item of evidence has not been tested and analyzed, that DNA testing and analysis would yield evidence of probative value, and that the item of evidence has not previously been the subject of DNA testing and analysis or that new DNA testing and analysis would yield a more accurate result, the court shall order DNA testing and analysis of the evidence.

The testing and analysis of the evidence shall be done by the Department of Kentucky State Police laboratory or at another laboratory selected by the Department of Kentucky State Police laboratory.

DNA testing and analysis results shall be made available to both the Commonwealth and the defendant, and either the Commonwealth or the defendant may move that they be admitted at trial.

If the defendant is convicted of any offense for which DNA test and analysis results are required to be maintained by law, the DNA test and analysis results obtained pursuant to this section shall be utilized for that purpose, whether or not the test and analysis results were introduced in the case.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 154, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 308, effective June 26, 2007.

422.290.
Attendance of Department of Corrections personnel as witnesses in civil suits out of county — Records provable by copy.

No officer or employee of the Department of Corrections shall be required to give personal attendance as a witness in any civil suit, arising from that person’s employment, out of the county in which his or her official workstation is situated, but his or her deposition shall be taken in lieu thereof. However, in the court in which the civil action is pending, if the court finds that the witness is a necessary witness for trial, the court may order the personal attendance of the witness at trial.

Subject to the approval of the court, the Department of Corrections records which relate to supervision, custody, or confinement of an offender or which constitute an offender’s medical charts or records that are susceptible to photostatic reproduction may be proved as to foundation, identity, and authenticity, without any preliminary testimony, by use of legible and durable copies certified by the employee of the department charged with the responsibility of being the custodian of the originals thereof. The certification shall be signed before a notary public by the employee and shall include the full name of the offender and, for medical charts or records, the offender’s medical record number and the number of pages in the medical record. The certification shall also include a legend substantially to the following effect: “The copies of records for which this certification is made are true and complete reproductions of the original or microfilmed records which are housed at (provide the office, address, and phone number). The original records were made in the regular course of business, and it was the regular course of the Department of Corrections to make the records at or near the time of the matter recorded. This certification is given by the custodian of the records in lieu of the custodian’s personal appearance.”

Nothing in this section shall be construed as a waiver of any privilege the department may have relating to the records.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 11, § 6, effective July 15, 2002.